Florida, session 2026, HB439.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (9) of section
460.403, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
460.403 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
(9)
(c)1. Chiropractic physicians may adjust, manipulate, or
treat the human body by manual, mechanical, electrical, or
natural methods; by the use of physical means or physiotherapy,
including light, heat, water, or exercise; by the use of
acupuncture; by the use of monofilament intramuscular
stimulation treatment, also known as dry needling, for trigger
points or myofascial pain; or by the administration of foods,
food concentrates, food extracts, and items for which a
prescription is not required and may apply first aid and
hygiene, but chiropractic physicians are expressly prohibited
from prescribing or administering to any person any legend drug
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb439-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 439 2026
except as authorized under subparagraph 2., from performing any
surgery except as stated herein, or from practicing obstetrics.
2. Notwithstanding the prohibition against prescribing and
administering legend drugs under subparagraph 1. or s.
499.83(2)(c), pursuant to board rule chiropractic physicians
may:
a. Order, store, possess and administer, for emergency
purposes only at the chiropractic physician's office or place of
business, prescription medical oxygen. and may also
b. Order, store, possess, and administer any solution the
following topical anesthetics in aerosol form:
(I)a. Any solution Consisting of 25 percent ethyl
chloride ethylchloride and 75 percent dichlorodifluoromethane;
or.
(II)b. Any solution Consisting of 15 percent
dichlorodifluoromethane and 85 percent
trichloromonofluoromethane.
c. Order, store, possess, prescribe, and administer by
means of injection, vitamins, minerals, and nutritional
supplements in sterile form that are proprietary or over-the-
counter drugs as defined in s. 499.003; however, the
administration of such sterile substances may only take place at
the chiropractic physician's office or place of business.

However, this paragraph does not authorize a chiropractic
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb439-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 439 2026
physician to prescribe medical oxygen as defined in s.
499.82(10) or to administer any substance through intravenous
therapy.
Section 2. Section 460.4086, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
460.4086 Administration of sterile substances by
chiropractic physicians.—
(1) A chiropractic physician must be certified before
administering sterile substances by means of injection to a
patient.
(2) The board shall establish minimum standards of
practice for the administration of sterile substances by means
of injection by chiropractic physicians, including, at a
minimum, all of the following:
(a) Completion of 36 hours of continuing education
consisting of didactic lectures and laboratory training on the
safe and effective administration of vitamins, minerals, and
nutritional supplements, including, but not limited to,
protocols, indications, and contraindications.
(b) Passage of a written and practical examination.
(c) A requirement that the administration of sterile
substances by means of injection may not be performed without
patient consent and education on the risks and adverse events
that could occur. Such patient consent and education must be
100 included as part of the patient's documented plan of care.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb439-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 439 2026
101 (d) A requirement that the administration of sterile
102 substances by means of injection may not be delegated to any
103 person other than a chiropractic physician who is authorized to
104 administer sterile substances by means of injection under this
105 chapter.
106 (3) When a chiropractic physician submits documentation to
107 the board verifying completion of the continuing education
108 requirements and passage of examination under this section, the
109 board must issue the chiropractic physician a letter certifying
110 that the chiropractic physician is authorized to administer the
111 sterile substances.
112 (4) The board shall adopt rules to implement this section.
113 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb439-02-c2